Utah statutes.
41-6a-1006.   Vehicles to exercise due care to avoid pedestrians -- Audible signals and caution.

(1)  The operator of a vehicle shall:

(a)  exercise care to avoid colliding with a pedestrian;

(b)  give an audible signal when necessary; and

(c)  exercise appropriate precaution if the operator of the vehicle observes a child or an obviously confused, incapacitated, or intoxicated person.

(2)  This section supersedes any conflicting provision of:

(a)  this chapter; or

(b)  a local ordinance in accordance with Section 41-6a-208.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

